Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1025.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142A.609, subdivision 11, is amended to read: Subd. 11. Treatment of Supplemental Security Income. deleted text begin (a) If a child placed in foster care receives benefits through Supplemental Security Income (SSI) at the time of foster care placement or subsequent to placement in foster care, the financially responsible agency may apply to be the payee for the child for the duration of the child's placement in foster care.deleted text end If a child continues to be eligible for deleted text begin SSIdeleted text end new text begin Supplemental Security Income (SSI) benefitsnew text end after finalization of the adoption or transfer of permanent legal and physical custody and is determined to be eligible for a payment under Northstar Care for Children, a permanent caregiver may choose to receive payment from both programs simultaneously. The permanent caregiver is responsible to report the amount of the payment to the Social Security Administration and the SSI payment will be reduced as required by the Social Security Administration. deleted text begin (b) If a financially responsible agency applies to be the payee for a child who receives benefits through SSI, or receives the benefits under this subdivision on behalf of a child, the financially responsible agency must provide written notice by certified mail, return receipt requested to: deleted text end deleted text begin (1) the child, if the child is 13 years of age or older; deleted text end deleted text begin (2) the child's parent, guardian, or custodian or if there is no legal parent or custodian the child's relative selected by the agency; deleted text end deleted text begin (3) the guardian ad litem; deleted text end deleted text begin (4) the legally responsible agency; and deleted text end deleted text begin (5) the counsel appointed for the child pursuant to section 260C.163, subdivision 3. deleted text end deleted text begin (c) If a financially responsible agency receives benefits under this subdivision on behalf of a child 13 years of age or older, the legally responsible agency and the guardian ad litem must disclose this information to the child in person in a manner that best helps the child understand the information. This paragraph does not apply in circumstances where the child is living outside of Minnesota. deleted text end deleted text begin (d) If a financially responsible agency receives the benefits under this subdivision on behalf of a child, it cannot use those funds for any other purpose than the care of that child. The financially responsible agency must not commingle any benefits received under this subdivision and must not put the benefits received on behalf of a child under this subdivision into a general fund. deleted text end deleted text begin (e) If a financially responsible agency receives any benefits under this subdivision, it must keep a record of: deleted text end deleted text begin (1) the total dollar amount it received on behalf of all children it receives benefits for; deleted text end deleted text begin (2) the total number of children it applied to be a payee for; and deleted text end deleted text begin (3) the total number of children it received benefits for. deleted text end deleted text begin (f) By July 1, 2025, and each July 1 thereafter, each financially responsible agency must submit a report to the commissioner of children, youth, and families that includes the information required under paragraph (e). By September 1 of each year, the commissioner must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over child protection that compiles the information provided to the commissioner by each financially responsible agency under paragraph (e); subdivision 12, paragraph (e); and section 260C.331, subdivision 7, paragraph (d). This paragraph expires January 31, 2034. deleted text end Sec. 2. new text begin [142A.613] FOSTER CHILDREN ASSISTANCE TRUST. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin For the purposes of this section, "beneficiary" means a current or former child in foster care for whom a financially responsible agency sends federal cash assistance benefits to the commissioner of children, youth, and families pursuant to this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin (a) The foster children assistance trust is established. The trust consists of deposits made by the commissioner of children, youth, and families pursuant to this section. The trust must be managed to ensure the stability and growth of the trust. new text end new text begin (b) All assets of the trust are held in trust for the exclusive benefit of beneficiaries. Assets must be held in a separate account in the state treasury to be known as the foster children assistance trust account or in accounts with the third-party provider selected pursuant to subdivision 9. Trust assets are not subject to claims by creditors of the state, are not part of the general fund, and are not subject to appropriation by the state. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Requirements of financially responsible agencies. new text end new text begin (a) A financially responsible agency must assess whether each child the agency is responsible for is eligible to receive benefits through SSI. new text end new text begin (b) If a child placed in foster care is eligible to receive federal cash assistance benefits, the financially responsible agency must: new text end new text begin (1) apply to be the payee for the child for the duration of the child's placement in foster care; new text end new text begin (2) within 90 days of receipt, remit all benefit payments received as payee for a foster child's federal cash assistance benefits to the commissioner of children, youth, and families along with documentation identifying the child and amounts received for the child; new text end new text begin (3) notify each beneficiary above the age of 18 that the beneficiary may be entitled to disbursements pursuant to the foster children assistance trust and inform the child how to contact the commissioner of children, youth, and families about the trust; and new text end new text begin (4) retain all documentation related to federal cash assistance benefits received for a beneficiary for at least five years after the agency is no longer the beneficiary's financially responsible agency. new text end new text begin (c) The financially responsible agency is liable to a beneficiary for any benefit payment that the agency receives as payee for a beneficiary and that is not sent to the commissioner of children, youth, and families as required by this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Deposits. new text end new text begin The commissioner of children, youth, and families shall deposit all money sent pursuant to this section in the foster children assistance trust. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Commissioner's duties. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of children, youth, and families shall keep a record of the receipts and disbursements of the trust and a separate account for each beneficiary. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner shall determine annually the annual interest earnings of the trust, which include realized capital gains and losses. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner shall apportion any annual capital gains earnings to the separate beneficiaries' accounts. The rate to be used in this apportionment, computed to the last full quarter percent, must be determined by dividing the capital gains earnings by the total invested assets of the trust. new text end new text begin (d) For each beneficiary between the ages of 14 and 18, the commissioner must, by February 1 each year, notify the beneficiary of the amount of federal cash assistance benefits received on the beneficiary's behalf in the prior calendar year and the tax implications of those benefits. new text end new text begin (e) Account owner data, account data, and data on beneficiaries of accounts are private data on individuals or nonpublic data as defined in section 13.02. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Reimbursement. new text end new text begin The commissioner of children, youth, and families shall reimburse a financially responsible agency for all benefits sent to the commissioner pursuant to this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Reports. new text end new text begin (a) By December 1, 2026, the commissioner shall submit a report to the legislative committees with jurisdiction over children, youth, and families on the potential tax and state and federal benefit impacts of the trust and disbursements on beneficiaries and include recommendations on how best to minimize any increased tax burden or benefit reduction due to the trust. new text end new text begin (b) By December 1 of each year, the commissioner shall submit a report to the legislative committees with jurisdiction over children, youth, and families on the cost of reimbursing financially responsible agencies pursuant to this section and a projection for future costs. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Disbursements. new text end new text begin (a) Once a beneficiary has reached 18 years of age, the commissioner of children, youth, and families shall disburse $10,000 every year to the beneficiary until the beneficiary's account is depleted. new text end new text begin (b) With each disbursement, the commissioner shall include information about the potential tax and benefits consequences of the disbursement. new text end new text begin (c) On petition of a minor beneficiary who is at least 14 years old, a court may order the commissioner to deliver or pay to the beneficiary or expend for the beneficiary's benefit the amount of the beneficiary's trust account as the court considers advisable for the use and benefit of the beneficiary. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Administration. new text end new text begin The commissioner shall administer the program pursuant to this section. The commissioner may contract with one or more third parties to carry out some or all of these administrative duties, including managing the assets of the trust and ensuring that records are maintained. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of children, youth, and families to reimburse financially responsible agencies for federal cash assistance benefits sent to the commissioner pursuant to Minnesota Statutes, section 142A.613. new text end